Illinois, session 104th, HB3026.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Article 514D as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/Art. 14D heading new)7ARTICLE 14D. DUAL LANGUAGE EDUCATION 8    (105 ILCS 5/14D-5 new)9    Sec. 14D-5. Statewide guidance. 10    (a) By December 15, 2026, the State Board of Education 11shall adopt comprehensive guidance for school districts 12regarding the establishment of new dual language education 13programs and the expansion of existing dual language education 14programs.15    (b) The guidance adopted under this Section shall cover 16the following topics:17        (1) program structure;18        (2) curriculum;19        (3) instruction;20        (4) assessment and accountability;21        (5) staff quality and professional development;22        (6) family and community engagement; and  HB3026 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06353 LNS 16389 b1        (7) support and resources. 2    (105 ILCS 5/14D-10 new)3    Sec. 14D-10. Equity Journey Continuum. By July 1, 2029, 4the State Board of Education's Equity Journey Continuum shall 5integrate the following components into the comprehensive 6strategic plan developed by the State Board of Education under 7Section 2-3.47a:8        (1) Dual language education into the broader framework 9    of student learning to ensure it is considered an 10    essential part of educational equity and excellence.11        (2) Specific provisions for dual language teachers, 12    focusing on recruitment, professional development, and 13    retention of bilingual educators. 14    (105 ILCS 5/14D-15 new)15    Sec. 14D-15. Biliteracy recognition. By July 1, 2027, the 16State Board of Education shall establish recognition pathways 17for biliteracy at various levels before high school. School 18districts may choose to participate in the pathways to 19biliteracy program. The pathways recognition shall include:20        (1) a recognition pathway for biliteracy for 21    prekindergarten or kindergarten students;22        (2) a recognition pathway for biliteracy for 5th grade 23    students; and24        (3) a recognition pathway for biliteracy for 8th grade   HB3026 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06353 LNS 16389 b1    students.2    The State Board of Education may adopt rules to implement 3the requirements of this Section.